North Carolina statutes. Chapter 157. Housing Authorities and Projects.
Article 1. Housing Authorities Law.
§ 157-17.1.
Approval of mortgages by Local Government Commission; considerations; rules and regulations.

With the exception of mortgages under

G.S. 157-17

, no housing authority may execute any mortgage authorized by this Chapter without the approval of the Local Government Commission.

The Local Government Commission shall consider, in any application by a housing authority for approval of a mortgage, the following issues:

The value of the property, and any other secured indebtedness upon the property;

The ability of the authority to repay the indebtedness secured by the mortgage;

Any other issues it deems necessary to insure the financial soundness of the housing authority.

The Local Government Commission shall adopt rules and regulations to implement this section.

History.

1979, c. 690, s. 5.

§ 157-18.
Remedies of an obligee of authority.

An obligee of the authority shall have the right in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

By mandamus, suit, action or proceeding in law or equity (all of which may be joined in one action) to compel the authority, and the commissioners, officers, agents or employees thereof to perform each and every term, provision and covenant contained in any contract of the authority, and to require the carrying out of any or all covenants and agreements of the authority and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon the authority by this Article.

By suit, action or proceeding in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of the authority.

By suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to cause possession of any housing project or any part thereof to be surrendered to any obligee having the right to such possession pursuant to any contract of the authority.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 18.

§ 157-19.
Additional remedies conferrable by mortgage or trust indenture.

Any authority shall have power by its trust indenture, mortgage, lease or other contract to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, lease or other obligations the right upon the happening of an “event of default” as defined in such instrument:

By suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to obtain the appointment of a receiver of any housing project of the authority or any part or parts thereof. If such receiver be appointed, he may enter and take possession of such housing project or any part or parts thereof and operate and maintain same, and collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the authority itself might do and shall keep such moneys in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of the authority as the court shall direct.

By suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to require the authority and the commissioners thereof to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 19.

§ 157-20.
Remedies cumulative.

All the rights and remedies hereinabove conferred shall be cumulative and in addition to all other rights and remedies that may be conferred upon such obligee of the authority by law or by any contract with the authority.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 20.

§ 157-21.
Limitations on remedies of obligee.

All property of the authority shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution shall issue against the same. No judgment against the authority shall be a charge or lien against its property, real or personal. The provisions of this section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees of any mortgage of the authority provided for in

G.S. 157-17

, after foreclosure sale thereunder, to obtain a judgment or decree for any deficiency due on the indebtedness secured thereby and to issue execution on the credit of the authority. Such deficiency judgment or decree shall be a lien and charge upon the property of the authority, which may be levied on and sold by virtue of an execution or other judicial process for the purpose of satisfying such deficiency judgment or decree.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 21; 1979, c. 690, s. 4.

§ 157-22.
Title obtained at foreclosure sale subject to agreement with government.

Notwithstanding anything in this Article to the contrary, any purchaser or purchasers at a sale of real or personal property of the authority whether pursuant to any foreclosure of a mortgage, pursuant to judicial process or otherwise, shall obtain title subject to any contract between the authority and a government relating to the supervision by a government of the operation and maintenance of such property and the construction of improvements thereon.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 22.

§ 157-23.
Contracts with federal government.

In addition to the powers conferred upon the authority by other provisions of this Article, the authority is empowered to borrow money and/or accept grants from the federal government for or in aid of the construction of any housing project which such authority is authorized by this Article to undertake, to take over any land acquired by the federal government for the construction of a housing project, to take over or lease or manage any housing project constructed or owned by the federal government, and to these ends, to enter into such contracts, mortgages, trust indentures, leases or other agreements as the federal government may require including agreements that the federal government shall have the right to supervise and approve the construction, maintenance and operation of such housing project. It is the purpose and intent of this Article to authorize every authority to do any and all things necessary to secure the financial aid and the cooperation of the federal government in the construction, maintenance and operation of any housing project which the authority is empowered by this Article to undertake.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 23.

§ 157-24.
Security for funds deposited by authorities.

The authority may by resolution provide that

All moneys deposited by it shall be secured by obligations of the United States or of the State of a market value equal at all times to the amount of such deposits or

By any securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds within their control or

By an undertaking with such sureties as shall be approved by the authority faithfully to keep and pay over upon the order of the authority any such deposits and agreed interest thereon, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give any such security for such deposits.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 24.

§ 157-25.
Housing bonds, legal investments and security.

The State and all public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, and public bodies, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds issued by a housing authority established (or hereafter established) pursuant to this Article or issued by any public housing authority or agency in the United States, when such bonds are secured by a pledge of annual contributions to be paid by the United States government or any agency thereof, or bonds which may be issued notwithstanding any other limitations of this Chapter, by a not-for-profit corporate agency of a housing authority secured by rentals payable pursuant to section 23 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended, or by rental assistance payments under any other section of said act, as amended, and any such bonds shall be authorized security for all public deposits and shall be fully negotiable in this State; it being the purpose of this Article to authorize any persons, firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions, bodies and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them, including (but not limited to) sinking, insurance, investment, retirement, compensation, pension and trust funds, and funds held on deposit, for the purchase of any such bonds and that any such bonds shall be authorized security for all public deposits and shall be fully negotiable in this State: Provided, however, that nothing contained in this Article shall be construed as relieving any person, firm or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 25; 1941, c. 78, s. 3; 1971, c. 1161; 1977, c. 784, s. 4.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Expanding the Role of North Carolina State Courts in Resolving Public Housing Disputes,” see 33 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 40 (2010).

§ 157-26.
Tax exemptions.

An authority is a local government agency and is exempt from taxation to the same extent as a unit of local government. Property owned by an authority is exempt from taxation in accordance with Article V, § 2 of the North Carolina Constitution. Bonds and other obligations issued by an authority or its corporate agent authorized by this Article to exercise its powers are declared to be issued for a public purpose and to be public instrumentalities. These obligations are exempt from all State, county, and municipal taxation or assessment, direct or indirect, general or special, whether imposed for the purpose of general revenue or otherwise, excluding income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the obligations, and franchise taxes. The interest on the obligations is not subject to taxation as income.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 26; 1953, c. 907; 1973, c. 695, s. 7; 1977, c. 784, s. 5; 1995, c. 46, s. 17; 2015-264, s. 16(i).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 16(i), effective October 1, 2015, deleted “inheritance and gift taxes” preceding “income taxes on the gain” in the next-to-last sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For brief comment on the 1953 amendment to this section, see 31 N.C.L. Rev. 442 (1953).

§ 157-26.1.
Exemption from real estate licensure requirements.

The authority and the regular salaried employees of the authority shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 93A of the General Statutes as provided in G.S. 93A-2(c)(8).

History.

1999-409, s. 2.

§ 157-27.
Reports.

The authority shall at least once a year file with the mayor of the city a report of its activities for the preceding year, and shall make any recommendations with reference to any additional legislation or other action that may be necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this Article.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 27.

Local Modification.

City of Durham: 1971, c. 575.

§ 157-28.
Restriction on right of eminent domain; right of appeal preserved; investigation by Utilities Commission.

Notwithstanding any finding of public convenience and necessity, either in general or specific, by the terms of this Article, the right of eminent domain shall not be exercised unless and until a certificate of public convenience and necessity for such project has been issued by the Utilities Commission of North Carolina, and the proceedings leading up to the issuing of such certificate of public convenience and necessity, and the right to appeal therefrom shall be as now provided by law and said rights are hereby expressly reserved to all interested parties in said proceedings. In addition to the powers now granted by law to the Utilities Commission of North Carolina, the said Utilities Commission is hereby vested with full power and authority to investigate and examine all projects set up or attempted to be set up under the provisions of this Article and determine the question of the public convenience and necessity for said project.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 28.

§ 157-29.
Rentals; tenant selections; and summary ejectments.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this State that each housing authority shall manage and operate its housing projects in an efficient manner so as to enable it to fix the cost of dwelling accommodations for persons of low income at the lowest possible rates consistent with its providing decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations. No housing authority may construct or operate its housing projects so as to provide revenues for other activities of the city.

In the operation or management of housing projects, portions of projects, or other housing assistance programs for persons of low income, an authority shall at all times observe the following duties with respect to rentals and tenant selection:

It may rent or lease dwelling accommodations set aside for persons of low income only to persons who lack the amount of income that is necessary (as determined by the housing authority undertaking the project) to enable them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding; and

It may rent or lease dwelling accommodations to persons of low income only at rentals within the financial reach of such persons.

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-219, s. 1, effective August 8, 2006.

(3a)

It shall comply with the following targeting requirements:

Not less than forty percent (40%) of the families admitted to its public housing program from its waiting list in its fiscal year shall be extremely low-income families with incomes at or below thirty percent (30%) of the area median income. For purposes of this section, this shall be known as the “basic targeting requirement”.

To the extent provided in sub-subdivisions c. and d. of this subdivision, the admission of extremely low-income families to its Section 8 voucher program during the same fiscal year shall be credited against the basic targeting requirement. For purposes of this section, “Section 8” refers to Section 8 of the U.S. Housing Act of 1937 as amended.

If admissions of extremely low-income families to its Section 8 voucher program during its fiscal year exceed the seventy-five percent (75%) minimum targeting requirement for its Section 8 voucher program, the excess shall be credited against its basic targeting requirement for the same fiscal year.

The fiscal year credit for Section 8 voucher program admissions that exceeded the minimum Section 8 voucher program targeting requirement shall not exceed the lower of any of the following:

Ten percent (10%) of its waiting list admissions during its fiscal year.

Ten percent (10%) of waiting list admissions to its Section 8 tenant-based assistance program during its fiscal year.

The number of qualifying low-income families who, during the fiscal year, commence occupancy of its public housing units that are located in census tracts with a poverty rate of thirty percent (30%) or more. For purposes of this sub-sub-subdivision, qualifying low-income family means a low-income family other than an extremely low-income family.

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-219, s. 1, effective August 8, 2006.

(4a)

Its targeting requirement for tenant-based assistance shall ensure that not less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the families admitted to its tenant-based voucher program from its waiting list during its fiscal year shall be extremely low-income families with incomes at or below thirty percent (30%) of the area median income.

An authority may terminate or refuse to renew a rental agreement for a serious or repeated violation of a material term of the rental agreement such as (i) failure to make payments due under the rental agreement, if such payments were properly and promptly calculated according to applicable HUD regulation, whether or not such failure was the fault of the tenant, (ii) failure to fulfill the tenant obligations set forth in 24 C.F.R. Section 966.4(f) or other applicable provisions of federal law as they may be amended from time to time, or (iii) other good cause. Except in the case of failure to make payments due under a rental agreement, fault on the part of a tenant may be considered in determining whether good cause exists to terminate a rental agreement.

The receipt or acceptance of rent by an authority, with or without knowledge of a prior default or failure by the tenant under a rental agreement, shall not constitute a waiver of that default or failure unless (i) the authority expressly agrees to such waiver in writing, or (ii) within 120 days after obtaining knowledge of the default or failure, the authority fails either to notify the tenant that a violation of the rental agreement has occurred or to exercise one of the authority’s remedies for such violation.

In any summary ejectment action wherein a housing authority alleges that a tenant’s lease has been terminated because the tenant, a household member, or a guest has engaged in a criminal activity that threatens the health and safety of others or the peaceful enjoyment of the premises by others, or has engaged in activity involving illegal drugs, as defined in 24 C.F.R. § 966.4, the housing authority may bring an action under Article 7 of Chapter 42 of the General Statutes.

History.

1939, c. 150; 1985, c. 741, s. 2; 1987, c. 464, s. 5; 1989, c. 272; 1995, c. 520, s. 1; 1997-473, s. 1; 2005-423, s. 8; 2006-219, s. 1; 2006-259, s. 39.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-423, s. 8, effective October 1, 2005, in subsection (b), in the introductory language, inserted “or other housing assistance programs” and made a related stylistic change; and added subdivisions (b)(3) and (b)(4).

Session Laws 2006-219, s. 1, effective August 8, 2006, repealed
subdivision (b)(3), which read: “In the administration of its waiting lists, it shall adopt a preference for households with incomes of less than thirty percent (30%) of the area median income.”; added subdivision (b)(3a); repealed subdivision (b)(4), which read: “An authority shall take applications on a continuous basis from persons meeting the preference listed in this section and shall not close the application process to these persons. Any additional local preferences shall not take priority over the preference in this section.”; and added subdivision (b)(4a).

Session Laws 2006-259, s. 39, effective August 23, 2006, in subdivision (b)(3a)b., substituted “sub-subdivisions c. and d. of this subdivision” for “subdivision (4a) of this subsection”; in subdivision (b)(3a)c., substituted “exceed the” for “exceeds” and deleted “of the” preceding “minimum”; in subdivision (b)(3a)d., inserted “any of” near the end of the introductory paragraph; and made minor punctuation and stylistic changes throughout subdivision (b)(3a).

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “New Developments for Federally Subsidized Housing Tenants in North Carolina,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1455 (1986).

For article, “Expanding the Role of North Carolina State Courts in Resolving Public Housing Disputes,” see 33 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 40 (2010).

For comment, “Lots of Squeeze, Little (or No) Juice: North Carolina’s Habitual Misdemeanor Larceny Statute, a Law Where Results Do Not Justify Costs,” see 97 N.C.L. Rev. 432 (2019).

§ 157-29.1.
Fraudulent misrepresentation.

Any person whether provider or recipient, or person representing himself as such, who willfully and knowingly and with intent to deceive makes a false statement or representation or who willfully and knowingly and with intent to deceive fails to disclose a material fact and as a result of making a false statement or representation or failing to disclose a material fact obtains, for himself or another person, attempts to obtain for himself or another person, or continues to receive housing assistance in the amount or value of not more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person whether provider or recipient, or person representing himself as such, who willfully and knowingly and with intent to deceive makes a false statement or representation or who willfully and knowingly and with intent to deceive fails to disclose a material fact and as a result of making a false statement or representation or failing to disclose a material fact obtains, for himself or another person, or continues to receive housing assistance in the amount or value of more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) is guilty of a Class I felony.

As used in this section the word “person” means person, association, consortium, body politic, partnership, or other group, entity, or organization.

History.

1985, c. 741, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 1080; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “New Developments for Federally Subsidized Housing Tenants in North Carolina,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1455 (1986).

§ 157-30.
Creation and establishment validated.

The creation and establishment of housing authorities under the provisions of Chapter 456, Public Laws of 1935, as amended by Chapter 2, Public Laws of 1938, Extra Session, and as further amended by Chapter 150, Public Laws of 1939, and any additional amendments thereto, known as the Housing Authorities Law [G.S. 157-1 et seq.], together with all proceedings, acts and things heretofore undertaken, performed or done with reference thereto, are hereby validated, ratified, confirmed, approved and declared legal in all respects, notwithstanding any want of statutory authority or any defect or irregularity therein.

History.

1939, c. 118, s. 1; 1941, c. 62, s. 1.

Cross References.

For additional validation provision relating to the creation, establishment and organization of housing authorities, see

G.S. 157-32.1

.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the 1941 act, see 19 N.C.L. Rev. 484 (1941).

§ 157-31.
Contracts, agreements, etc., validated.

All contracts, agreements, obligations and undertakings of such housing authorities heretofore entered into relating to financing or aiding in the development, construction, maintenance or operation of any housing project or projects or to obtaining aid therefor from the United States Housing Authority, including (without limiting the generality of the foregoing) loan and annual contributions contracts and leases with the United States Housing Authority, agreements with municipalities or other public bodies (including those which are pledged or authorized to be pledged for the protection of the holders of any notes or bonds issued by such housing authorities or which are otherwise made a part of the contract with such holders of notes or bonds) relating to cooperation and contributions in aid of housing projects, payments (if any) in lieu of taxes, furnishing of municipal services and facilities, and the elimination of unsafe and insanitary dwellings, and contracts for the construction of housing projects, together with all proceedings, acts and things heretofore undertaken, performed or done with reference thereto, are hereby validated, ratified, confirmed, approved and declared legal in all respects, notwithstanding any want of statutory authority or any defect or irregularity therein.

History.

1939, c. 118, s. 2; 1941, c. 62, s. 2.

Cross References.

For additional validation provision relating to contracts and agreements, see

G.S. 157-32.2

.

§ 157-32.
Proceedings for issuance, etc., of bonds and notes validated.

All proceedings, acts and things heretofore undertaken, performed or done in or for the authorization, issuance, execution and delivery of notes and bonds by housing authorities for the purpose of financing or aiding in the development or construction of a housing project or projects, and all notes and bonds heretofore issued by housing authorities are hereby validated, ratified, confirmed, approved and declared legal in all respects, notwithstanding any want of statutory authority or any defect or irregularity therein.

History.

1939, c. 118, s. 3; 1941, c. 62, s. 3.

Cross References.

For additional validation provision relating to bonds and notes, see

G.S. 157-32.3

.

§ 157-32.1.
Other validation of creation, etc.

The creation, establishment and organization of housing authorities under the provisions of the Housing Authorities Law (Chapter 456, Public Laws of 1935, as amended, codified as

G.S. 157-1

et seq.), together with all proceedings, acts and things heretofore undertaken or done with reference thereto, are hereby validated and declared legal in all respects.

History.

1943, c. 89, s. 1.

§ 157-32.2.
Other validation of contracts, agreements, etc.

All contracts, agreements and undertakings of such housing authorities heretofore entered into relating to financing, or aiding in the development or operation of any housing projects, including (without limiting the generality of the foregoing) loan and annual contributions contracts, agency contracts and leases, agreements with municipalities or other public bodies (including those which are pledged or authorized to be pledged for the protection of the holders of any notes or bonds issued by such housing authorities or which are otherwise made a part of the contract with such holders of notes or bonds) relating to cooperation in aid of housing projects, payments to public bodies in the State, furnishing of municipal services and facilities and the elimination of unsafe and insanitary dwellings, and contracts for the construction of housing projects, together with all proceedings, acts and things heretofore undertaken or done with reference thereto, are hereby validated and declared legal in all respects.

History.

1943, c. 89, s. 2.

§ 157-32.3.
Other validation of bonds and notes.

All proceedings, acts and things heretofore undertaken or done in or for the authorization, issuance, execution and delivery of notes and bonds by housing authorities for the purpose of financing or aiding in the development or construction of a housing project or projects, and all notes and bonds heretofore issued by housing authorities are hereby validated and declared legal in all respects.

History.

1943, c. 89, s. 3.

§ 157-32.4.
Further validation of contracts, agreements, etc.

All contracts or agreements of housing authorities heretofore entered into with the federal government or its agencies, and with municipalities or others relating to financial assistance for housing projects in which it was required that loans or advances shall bear an interest rate in excess of six per centum (6%) per annum, or in which a municipality or others had agreed to pay funds equal to the interest in excess of six per centum (6%) per annum are hereby validated, ratified, confirmed, approved and declared legal with respect to the payment of interest in excess of six per centum (6%), and all things done or performed in reference thereto. The housing authorities are hereby authorized to assume the full obligation of the municipalities under the contracts or agreements with reference to interest in excess of six per centum (6%), and to reimburse any municipality which has made any interest payment under such contracts or agreements.

History.

1971, c. 87, s. 2.

§ 157-33.
Notice, hearing and creation of authority for a county.

Any 25 residents of a county may file a petition with the clerk of the board of county commissioners setting forth that there is a need for an authority to function in the county. Upon the filing of such a petition such clerk shall give notice of the time, place and purposes of a public hearing at which the board of county commissioners will determine the need for an authority in the county. Such notice shall be given at the county’s expense by publishing a notice, at least 10 days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county or, if there be no such newspaper, by posting such a notice in at least three public places within the county, at least 10 days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held.

Upon the date fixed for said hearing to be held upon notice as provided herein, an opportunity to be heard shall be granted to all residents and taxpayers of the county and to all other interested persons. After such a hearing, the board of county commissioners shall determine (i) whether insanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in the county and/or (ii) whether there is a lack of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in the county available for all the inhabitants thereof. In determining whether dwelling accommodations are unsafe or insanitary, the board of county commissioners shall take into consideration the following: the physical condition and age of the buildings; the degree of overcrowding; the percentage of the land coverage; the light and air available to the inhabitants of such dwelling accommodations; the size and arrangement of the rooms; the sanitary facilities; and the extent to which conditions exist in such buildings which endanger life or property by fire or other causes.

If it shall determine that either or both of the above enumerated conditions exist, the board of county commissioners shall adopt a resolution so finding (which need not go into any detail other than the mere finding) and shall thereupon either (i) determine that the board of county commissioners shall itself constitute and act ex officio as an authority or (ii) appoint, as hereinafter provided, not less than five nor more than nine commissioners to act as an authority. Said authority shall be a public body and a body corporate and politic upon the completion of the taking of the following proceedings:

The commissioners shall present to the Secretary of State an application signed by them, which shall set forth (without any detail other than the mere recital)

That a notice has been given and public hearing has been held as aforesaid, that the board of county commissioners made the aforesaid determination after such hearing and appointed them as commissioners;

The name, and official residence of each of the commissioners, together with a certified copy of the appointment evidencing their right to office, the date and place of induction into and taking oath of office, and that they desire the housing authority to become a public body and a body corporate and politic under this Article;

The term of office of each of the commissioners, except where the authority consists of the board of county commissioners ex officio;

The name which is proposed for the corporation; and

The location of the principal office of the proposed corporation.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of said commissioners before an officer authorized by the laws of the State to take and certify oaths, who shall certify upon the application that he personally knows the commissioners and knows them to be the officers as asserted in the application, and that each subscribed and swore thereto in the officer’s presence. The Secretary of State shall examine the application and if he finds that the name proposed for the corporation is not identical with that of a person or of any other corporation of this State or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty he shall receive and file it and shall record it in an appropriate book of record in his office.

When the application has been made, filed and recorded, as herein provided, the authority shall constitute a public body and a body corporate and politic under the name proposed in the application; the Secretary of State shall make and issue to the said commissioners, a certificate of incorporation pursuant to this Article, under the seal of the State, and shall record the same with the application.

If the board of county commissioners, after a hearing as aforesaid, shall determine that neither of the above enumerated conditions exist, it shall adopt a resolution denying the petition. After three months shall have expired from the date of the denial of any such petitions, subsequent petitions may be filed as aforesaid and new hearings and determinations made thereon.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to any contract of the authority, the authority shall be conclusively deemed to have been established in accordance with the provisions of this Article upon proof of the issuance of the aforesaid certificate by the Secretary of State. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the Secretary of State, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action or proceeding, and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents thereof.

History.

1941, c. 78, s. 4; 1943, c. 636, s. 7; 1969, c. 785, s. 1; 1981, c. 21, s. 1.

§ 157-34.
Commissioners and powers of authority for a county.

The commissioners of a housing authority created for a county may be appointed and removed by the board of county commissioners of the county in the same manner as the commissioners of a housing authority created for a city may be appointed and removed by the mayor; provided, that the board of county commissioners may determine in the case of any authority for its county that the board of county commissioners itself shall constitute and act ex officio as the authority. The board of county commissioners may at any time by resolution or ordinance increase or decrease the membership of an authority, within the limitations prescribed in

G.S. 157-33

. Except as otherwise provided herein, each housing authority created for a county and the commissioners thereof shall have the same functions, rights, powers, duties and limitations provided for housing authorities created for cities and the commissioners of such housing authorities: Provided, that for such purposes the term “mayor” or “council” as used in the housing authorities law and any amendments thereto shall be construed as meaning “board of county commissioners,” the term “city clerk” as used therein shall be construed as meaning “clerk of the board of county commissioners” and the term “city” as used therein shall be construed as meaning “county” unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context: Provided, further, that a housing authority created for a county shall not be subject to the limitations provided in subdivision (4) of

G.S. 157-29

of the housing authorities law with respect to housing projects for farmers of low income.

History.

1941, c. 78, s. 4; 1969, c. 785, s. 2; 1981, c. 21, s. 2.